Rhode Island statutes. Title 30 Military Affairs and Defense
Chapter 15 Emergency Management
30-15-14.
Interstate emergency management and disaster compact.

This state hereby enacts into law and enters into the interstate emergency management and disaster compact with all states, as defined therein, which states have enacted or shall hereafter enact the compact in the form substantially as follows:

Article 1. The purpose of this compact is to provide mutual aid among the states in meeting any emergency or disaster from enemy attack or other cause (natural or otherwise) including terrorism. The prompt, full and effective utilization of the resources of the respective states, including such resources as may be available from the United States government or any other source, are essential to the safety, care and welfare of the people thereof in the event of any emergency, and any other resources, including personnel, equipment or supplies, shall be incorporated into a plan or plans of mutual aid to be developed among various state emergency management agencies or similar bodies of the states that are parties hereto. The directors of emergency management of all party states shall constitute a committee to formulate plans and take all necessary steps for the implementation of this compact.

Article 2. It shall be the duty of each party state to formulate emergency management plans and programs for application within such state. There shall be frequent consultation between the representatives of the states and with the federal emergency management agency and the free exchange of information and plans, including inventories of any materials and equipment available. In carrying out such plans and programs the party states shall so far as possible provide and follow uniform standards, practices and rules and regulations including:

Official identification to designate and distinguish the different emergency management services;

Mobilization of emergency management forces and other tests and exercises;

Warnings and signals tests, including mechanical devices to be used in connection therewith;

The effective utilization of the emergency alert system;

Shutting off water mains, gas mains, electric power connections and the suspension of all other utility services when deemed in the interest of overall public safety;

All materials or equipment used or to be used for emergency management purposes in order to assure that such materials and equipment will be easily and freely interchangeable when used in or by any other party state;

The conduct of population and the movement and cessation of movement of pedestrians and vehicular traffic, prior, during and subsequent to drills or actual emergencies or disasters;

The safety of public meetings or gatherings; and

Mobile support units.

Article 3. Any party state requested to render mutual aid shall take such action as is necessary to provide and make available the resources covered by this compact in accordance with the terms hereof; provided that it is understood that the state rendering aid may withhold resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for such state. Each party state shall extend to the emergency management forces of any other party state, while operating within its state limits under the terms and conditions of this compact, the same powers (except that of arrest unless specifically authorized by the receiving state), duties, rights, privileges and immunities as if they were performing their duties in the state in which normally employed or rendering services, State of Rhode Island emergency management forces will continue under the command and control of their regular leaders but the organizational units will come under the operational control of the emergency management authorities of the state receiving assistance.

Article 4. Whenever any person holds a license, certificate or other permit issued by a state evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical or other skills, such person may render aid involving such skill in any party state to meet an emergency or disaster and such state shall give due recognition to such license, certificate or other permit as if issued in the state in which aid is rendered.

Article 5. No party state or its officers or employees rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged, or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith.

Article 6. Inasmuch as it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two (2) or more states may differ from that appropriate among other states party hereto, this instrument contains elements of a broad base common to all states, and nothing herein contained shall preclude any state from entering into supplementary agreements with another state or states. Such supplementary agreements may comprehend, but shall not be limited to, provisions for evacuation, and reception of injured and other persons, and the exchange of medical, fire, police, public utility, reconnaissance, public assistance, transportation and communications personnel, equipment and supplies.

Article 7. Each party state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured members of the emergency management forces of that state and the representatives of deceased members of such forces in case such members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within such state.

Article 8. Any party state rendering aid in another state pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the party state receiving such aid for any loss or damage to, or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment answering a request for aid, and for the cost incurred in connection with such request; provided, that any aiding party state may assume in whole or in part such loss, damage, expense, or other cost, or may loan such equipment or donate such services to the receiving party state without charge or cost; and provided further that any two (2) or more party states may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs as among those states. The United States government may relieve the party state receiving aid from any liability and reimburse the party state supplying emergency management forces for the compensation paid to and the transportation, subsistence and maintenance expenses of such assistance during the time of the rendition of such aid or assistance outside the state and may also pay fair and reasonable compensation for the use or utilization of the supplies, materials, equipment or facilities so utilized or consumed.

Article 9. Plans for the orderly evacuation and reception of the general population as the result of an emergency or disaster shall be worked out from time to time between representatives of the party states and the various local emergency management areas thereof. Such plans shall include the manner of transporting such evacuees, the number of evacuees to be received in different areas, the manner in which food, clothing, housing, and medical care will be provided, the registration of the evacuees, the providing of facilities for the notification of relatives or friends and the forwarding of such evacuees to other areas or the bringing in of additional materials, supplies, and all other relevant factors. Such plans shall provide that the party state receiving evacuees shall be reimbursed generally for the out-of-pocket expenses incurred in receiving and caring for such evacuees, for expenditures for transportation, food, clothing, medicines and medical care and like items. Such expenditures shall be reimbursed by the party state of which the evacuees are residents, or by the United States government under plans approved by it. After the termination of the emergency or disaster the party state of which the evacuees are resident shall assume the responsibility for the ultimate support or repatriation of such evacuees.

Article 10. This compact shall be available to any state, territory or possession of the United States, and the District of Columbia. The term “state” may also include any neighboring foreign country or province or state thereof.

Article 11. The committee established pursuant to article 1 of this compact may request the civil defense agency of the United States government to act as an informational and coordinating body under this compact, and representatives of such agency of the United States government may attend meetings of such committee.

Article 12. This compact shall become operative immediately upon its ratification by any state as between it and any other state or states so ratifying and shall be subject to approval by congress unless prior congressional approval has been given. Duly authenticated copies of this compact and of such supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party states and the Rhode Island emergency management agency and other appropriate agencies of the United States government.

Article 13. This compact shall continue in force and remain binding on each party state until the legislature or the governor of such party state takes action to withdraw therefrom. Such action shall not be effective until thirty (30) days after notice thereof has been sent by the governor of the party state desiring to withdraw to the governors of all other party states.

Article 14. (a) This compact shall be construed to effectuate the purposes stated in article 1 hereof. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional, or the applicability thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the constitutionality of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to other persons and circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

(b)

Nothing in subsection (a) shall be construed to limit previous or future entry into the interstate emergency management and disaster compact of Rhode Island with other states.

(c)

If any person holds a license, certificate, or other permit issued by any other state or political subdivision thereof evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical, or other skills, the person may render aid involving that skill in Rhode Island to meet an emergency or disaster, and this state shall give due recognition to the license, certificate, or other permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2.

30-15-15.
Immunity from liability — Compensation for death or injury of disaster response workers.

All functions under this chapter, and all other activities relating to disaster response, are hereby declared to be governmental functions. Neither the state, nor any political subdivision thereof, nor other agencies of the state or political subdivision thereof, nor, except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith, any disaster response worker complying with, or reasonably attempting to comply with this chapter, or any order, rule, or regulation promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, or pursuant to any ordinance relating to precautionary measures enacted by any political subdivision of the state, shall be liable for the death of, or injury to, persons, or for damage to property, as a result of disaster response activity. The provisions of this section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he or she would otherwise be entitled under this chapter, nor under the Workers’ Compensation Act, chapters 29 — 38 of title 28, nor under any pension law, nor the right of any person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of Congress.

Any requirement for a license to practice any professional, mechanical, or other skill shall not apply to any authorized disaster response worker who shall, in the course of performing his or her duties as such, practice such professional, mechanical, or other skill during a disaster emergency.

In the absence of any other benefits as provided by law, all disaster response workers who shall be killed or sustain disability or injury while in training for or on disaster response duty shall be construed to be employees of the state, any other provisions of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, and shall be compensated in like manner as state employees are compensated under the provisions of chapters 29 — 38 of title 28.

As used in this section, the term “disaster response worker” shall include any full- or part-time paid, volunteer, or auxiliary employee of this state, other states, territories, or possessions, the District of Columbia, the federal government, any neighboring country, or any political subdivision thereof, or any agency or organization, or any private person, firm, or corporation performing disaster response services at any place in this state subject to the order or control of, or pursuant to a request of, the state government or any political subdivision thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 185, § 4; P.L. 2003, ch. 189, § 4; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 38.

30-15-16.
No private liability.

Any person controlling real estate or other premises who voluntarily, and without compensation, grants a license or privilege, or otherwise permits the designation or use of the whole or any part or parts of that real estate or premises for the purpose of sheltering persons during an actual, impending, mock, or practice disaster shall, together with his or her successors in interest, if any, not be civilly liable for negligently causing the death of, or injury to, any person on or about the real estate or premises or for the loss of, or damage to, the property of that person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2.

30-15-17.
Severability.

If any part, subdivision, or section of this chapter shall be declared unconstitutional, the validity of the remaining parts thereof shall not be affected thereby. If any provision of this chapter, or the application of that provision to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter and the application of that provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2.

30-15-18.
Enforcement.

It shall be the duty of every organization for disaster preparedness and response established pursuant to this chapter, and of the officers thereof, to execute and enforce such orders, rules, and regulations as may be made by the governor under authority of this chapter. Each organization shall have available for inspection at its office all orders, rules, and regulations made by the governor or under his or her authority.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2.

30-15-19.
Construction of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed liberally, but those charged with the exercise or enforcement of its great powers are directed to act with restraint and moderation and with strict regard to the rights of the people.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2.

30-15-20.
References to agency predecessor.

Wherever in any general or public law, the words “state council of defense”, “Rhode Island state council of defense”, or “council of defense” shall appear, these words shall mean and include the “Rhode Island emergency management agency” as established by this chapter. The “Rhode Island emergency management agency”, renamed by the action of this chapter, is hereby declared to be the successor to the Rhode Island state council of defense. All provisions of law shall, so far as applicable, be so construed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 67, § 2; P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 2.

30-15-21.
Penalties.

Any person violating any provisions of this chapter or any rule, order, or regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter shall upon conviction thereof be punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment not exceeding ninety (90) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 38.

30-15-22.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 29, § 17; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 41, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2000, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 13, 2000.

30-15-23 — 30-15-40.
Repealed.

30-15-41.
Approval of emergency response plans for the transportation of liquefied natural gas.

Findings. The general assembly hereby recognizes the paramount importance of establishing an emergency response plan for the transportation of liquefied natural gas within the state. The general assembly hereby also declares that the establishment of the emergency response plan is in the interest of the public health, safety, and welfare as a means to protect against the potential hazards presented by the transportation of liquefied natural gas.

No emergency response plan for the transportation of liquefied natural gas through the waters of Narragansett Bay and/or Mount Hope Bay shall be issued or implemented by the Rhode Island emergency management agency prior to the approval of the aforementioned emergency response plan by the general assembly and the city or town councils of Bristol, Jamestown, Middletown, Newport, Portsmouth, Tiverton, and Warren.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 208, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 38.

30-15-42.
Committee created — Purpose and composition.

There is hereby created within the Rhode Island emergency management agency a committee consisting of twenty-one (21) members, pursuant to the provisions of §

30-15-2

of this chapter, the interoperable communications committee (ICC), for the purpose of addressing the challenges associated with the statewide communications interoperability.

The interoperable communications committee (hereinafter referred to as the “committee”) shall consist of the following members who shall assemble no less than twelve (12) times annually or more often at the call of the chairperson or upon petition of a majority of its members:

The adjutant general of the Rhode Island national guard, or his/her designee;

The president of the Rhode Island Fire Chief’s Association, or his/her designee;

The president of the Rhode Island Police Chief’s Association, or his/her designee;

The executive director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency, or his/her designee;

A representative from a Rhode Island Level 1 trauma center designated by the president of the facility;

The chairperson of the Hospital Association of Rhode Island (HARI), or his/her designee;

The director of the city of Providence communications division, or his/her designee;

A representative of the Rhode Island statewide communications network (RISCON) system north zone appointed by the executive director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency;

A representative of the Rhode Island statewide communications network (RISCON) system south zone appointed by the executive director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency;

The colonel/superintendent of the Rhode Island state police, or his/her designee;

The director of the Rhode Island department of environmental management, or his/her designee;

The director of the Rhode Island department of transportation, or his/her designee;

The director of the Rhode Island department of corrections, or his/her designee;

The director of the Rhode Island department of information technology, or his/her designee;

The director of the Rhode Island department of health, or his/her designee;

The director of the Rhode Island public transit authority, or his/her designee;

The director of the Rhode Island bridge and turnpike authority, or his/her designee;

The associate director of the Rhode Island E-911 system, or his/her designee;

Chief Sachem of the Narragansett Indian Tribe, or his/her designee;

and two (2) members appointed by the executive director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency.

Each member of the committee may appoint a permanent designee to attend committee meetings in his/her absence. A quorum at meetings of the committee shall consist of a majority of its current membership.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 107, § 1.

30-15-43.
Statewide interoperable communications system.

The Rhode Island emergency management agency is hereby authorized and empowered to provide for the installation, operation, and maintenance of a statewide interoperable communications system for the purpose of promptly collecting, exchanging, disseminating, and distributing information relating to police, fire, first responder, and first-receiving health care facilities of the state. The system is to be installed, operated, and maintained in such cities and towns and entities as have organized systems and may connect directly or indirectly with similar systems in other states in accordance with rules and regulations as promulgated by the Rhode Island emergency management agency. These rules and regulations shall be reviewed and revised from time to time by the interoperable communications committee as established in §

30-15-42

. The Rhode Island emergency management agency is authorized to provide, for the location of the receiving system sites and to employ the necessary personnel for its operation. The system shall be called the Rhode Island statewide communications network (RISCON). The state departments and agencies and the cities and towns are authorized to provide through federal funding when available and general revenue when allocated, within the appropriations provided by law, for the location of equipment and for the personnel and supplies for their proper operation. The character of communication sent, and the time, place, and manner of sending messages, and all matters in connection with the RISCON system, shall be under the control and management of the executive director of the Rhode Island emergency management agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 107, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 2, § 38.

30-15-44.
International emergency management assistance compact.

The International Emergency Management Assistance Compact is hereby entered into and enacted into law with any and all of the states legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

Article I Purpose and Authorities —

The International Emergency Management Assistance Memorandum of Understanding, hereinafter referred to as the “compact,” is made and entered into by and among such of the jurisdictions as shall enact or adopt this compact, hereinafter referred to as “party jurisdictions.” For the purposes of this agreement, the term “jurisdictions” may include any or all of the States of Maine, New Hampshire, Vermont, Massachusetts, Rhode Island, and Connecticut and the Provinces of Québec, New Brunswick, Prince Edward Island, Nova Scotia and Newfoundland and Labrador, and such other states and provinces as may hereafter become a party to this compact.

The purpose of this compact is to provide for the possibility of mutual assistance among the jurisdictions entering into this compact in managing any emergency or disaster when the affected jurisdiction or jurisdictions ask for assistance, whether arising from natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster or civil emergency aspects of resource shortages.

This compact also provides for the process of planning mechanisms among the agencies responsible and for mutual cooperation, including, if need be, emergency-related exercises, testing, or other training activities using equipment and personnel simulating performance of any aspect of the giving and receiving of aid by party jurisdictions or subdivisions of party jurisdictions during emergencies, with such actions occurring outside actual declared emergency periods. Mutual assistance in this compact may include the use of emergency forces by mutual agreement among party jurisdictions.

Article II General Implementation —

Each party jurisdiction entering into this compact recognizes that many emergencies may exceed the capabilities of a party jurisdiction and that intergovernmental cooperation is essential in such circumstances. Each jurisdiction further recognizes that there will be emergencies that may require immediate access and present procedures to apply outside resources to make a prompt and effective response to such an emergency because few, if any, individual jurisdictions have all the resources they need in all types of emergencies or the capability of delivering resources to areas where emergencies exist.

The prompt, full and effective utilization of resources of the participating jurisdictions, including any resources on hand or available from any other source that are essential to the safety, care and welfare of the people in the event of any emergency or disaster, shall be the underlying principle on which all articles of this compact are understood.

On behalf of the party jurisdictions participating in the compact, the legally designated official who is assigned responsibility for emergency management is responsible for formulation of the appropriate inter-jurisdictional mutual aid plans and procedures necessary to implement this compact, and for recommendations to the jurisdiction concerned with respect to the amendment of any statutes, regulations or ordinances required for that purpose.

Article III Party Jurisdiction Responsibilities —

(a) Formulate plans and programs. It is the responsibility of each party jurisdiction to formulate procedural plans and programs for inter-jurisdictional cooperation in the performance of the responsibilities listed in this section. In formulating and implementing such plans and programs the party jurisdictions, to the extent practical, shall:

Review individual jurisdiction hazards analyses that are available and, to the extent reasonably possible, determine all those potential emergencies the party jurisdictions might jointly suffer, whether due to natural disaster, technological hazard, man-made disaster or emergency aspects of resource shortages;

Initiate a process to review party jurisdictions’ individual emergency plans and develop a plan that will determine the mechanism for the inter-jurisdictional cooperation;

Develop inter-jurisdictional procedures to fill any identified gaps and to resolve any identified inconsistencies or overlaps in existing or developed plans;

Assist in warning communities adjacent to or crossing jurisdictional boundaries;

Protect and ensure delivery of services, medicines, water, food, energy and fuel, search and rescue and critical lifeline equipment, services and resources, both human and material to the extent authorized by law; and

Inventory and agree upon procedures for the inter-jurisdictional loan and delivery of human and material resources, together with procedures for reimbursement or forgiveness.

(b)

Request assistance. The authorized representative of a party jurisdiction may request assistance of another party jurisdiction by contacting the authorized representative of that jurisdiction. These provisions only apply to requests for assistance made by and to authorized representatives. Requests may be verbal or in writing. If verbal, the request must be confirmed in writing within fifteen (15) days of the verbal request. Requests must provide the following information:

A description of the emergency service function for which assistance is needed and of the mission or missions, including, but not limited to, fire services, emergency medical, transportation, communications, public works and engineering, building inspection, planning and information assistance, mass care, resource support, health and medical services and search and rescue;

The amount and type of personnel, equipment, materials and supplies needed and a reasonable estimate of the length of time they will be needed; and

The specific place and time for staging of the assisting party’s response and a point of contact at the location.

(c)

Consultation among party jurisdiction officials. There shall be frequent consultation among the party jurisdiction officials who have assigned emergency management responsibilities, such officials collectively known hereinafter as the International Emergency Management Group, and other appropriate representatives of the party jurisdictions with free exchange of information, plans and resource records relating to emergency capabilities to the extent authorized by law.

Article IV Limitation —

Any party jurisdiction requested to render mutual aid or conduct exercises and training for mutual aid shall undertake to respond as soon as possible, except that it is understood that the jurisdiction rendering aid may withhold or recall resources to the extent necessary to provide reasonable protection for that jurisdiction. Each party jurisdiction shall afford to the personnel of the emergency forces of any party jurisdiction, while operating within its jurisdictional limits under the terms and conditions of this compact and under the operational control of an officer of the requesting party, the same powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities as are afforded similar or like forces of the jurisdiction in which they are performing emergency services. Emergency forces continue under the command and control of their regular leaders, but the organizational units come under the operational control of the emergency services authorities of the jurisdiction receiving assistance. These conditions may be activated, as needed, by the jurisdiction that is to receive assistance or upon commencement of exercises or training for mutual aid and continue as long as the exercises or training for mutual aid are in progress, the emergency or disaster remains in effect or loaned resources remain in the receiving jurisdiction or jurisdictions, whichever is longer. The receiving jurisdiction is responsible for informing the assisting jurisdictions of the specific moment when services will no longer be required.

Article V Licenses and Permits —

Whenever a person holds a license, certificate or other permit issued by any jurisdiction party to the compact evidencing the meeting of qualifications for professional, mechanical or other skills, and when such assistance is requested by the receiving party jurisdiction, such person is deemed to be licensed, certified or permitted by the jurisdiction requesting assistance to render aid involving such skill to meet an emergency or disaster, subject to such limitations and conditions as the requesting jurisdiction prescribes by executive order or otherwise.

Article VI Liability —

Any person or entity of a party jurisdiction rendering aid in another jurisdiction pursuant to this compact are considered agents of the requesting jurisdiction for tort liability and immunity purposes. Any person or entity rendering aid in another jurisdiction pursuant to this compact are not liable on account of any act or omission in good faith on the part of such forces while so engaged or on account of the maintenance or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith. Good faith in this article does not include willful misconduct, gross negligence or recklessness.

Article VII Supplementary Agreements —

Because it is probable that the pattern and detail of the machinery for mutual aid among two (2) or more jurisdictions may differ from that among the jurisdictions that are party to this compact, this compact contains elements of a broad base common to all jurisdictions, and nothing in this compact precludes any jurisdiction from entering into supplementary agreements with another jurisdiction or affects any other agreements already in force among jurisdictions. Supplementary agreements may include, but are not limited to, provisions for evacuation and reception of injured and other persons and the exchange of medical, fire, public utility, reconnaissance, welfare, transportation and communications personnel, equipment and supplies.

Article VIII Workers’ Compensation and Death Benefits —

Each party jurisdiction shall provide, in accordance with its own laws, for the payment of workers’ compensation and death benefits to injured members of the emergency forces of that jurisdiction and to representatives of deceased members of those forces if the members sustain injuries or are killed while rendering aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within their own jurisdiction.

Article IX Reimbursement —

Any party jurisdiction rendering aid in another jurisdiction pursuant to this compact shall, if requested, be reimbursed by the party jurisdiction receiving such aid for any loss or damage to or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment and the provision of any service in answering a request for aid and for the costs incurred in connection with those requests. An aiding party jurisdiction may assume in whole or in part any such loss, damage, expense or other cost or may loan such equipment or donate such services to the receiving party jurisdiction without charge or cost. Any two or more party jurisdictions may enter into supplementary agreements establishing a different allocation of costs among those jurisdictions. Expenses under article VIII are not reimbursable under this section.

Article X Evacuation —

Each party jurisdiction shall initiate a process to prepare and maintain plans to facilitate the movement of and reception of evacuees into its territory or across its territory, according to its capabilities and powers. The party jurisdiction from which the evacuees came shall assume the ultimate responsibility for the support of the evacuees, and after the termination of the emergency or disaster, for the repatriation of such evacuees.

Article XI Implementation —

(a) This compact is effective upon its execution or adoption by any two (2) jurisdictions, and is effective as to any other jurisdiction upon its execution or adoption thereby: subject to approval or authorization by the U.S. Congress, if required, and subject to enactment of provincial or state legislation that may be required for the effectiveness of the Memorandum of Understanding.

(b)

Any party jurisdiction may withdraw from this compact, but the withdrawal does not take effect until thirty (30) days after the governor or premier of the withdrawing jurisdiction has given notice in writing of such withdrawal to the governors or premiers of all other party jurisdictions. The action does not relieve the withdrawing jurisdiction from obligations assumed under this compact prior to the effective date of withdrawal.

(c)

Duly authenticated copies of this compact in the French and English languages and of such supplementary agreements as may be entered into shall, at the time of their approval, be deposited with each of the party jurisdictions.

Article XII Severability —

This compact is construed to effectuate the purposes stated in Article I. If any provision of this compact is declared unconstitutional or the applicability of the compact to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability of the compact to other persons and circumstances are not affected.

Article XIII Inconsistency of Language —

The validity of the arrangements and agreements consented to in this compact shall not be affected by any insubstantial difference in form or language as may be adopted by the various states and provinces.

Article XIV Amendment —

This compact may be amended by agreement of the party jurisdictions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 227, § 1.

30-15-45.
Essential mental health and substance use disorder services.

During any declared state or local disaster emergency pursuant to this chapter, mental health and substance use disorder services provided by Alcoholics Anonymous, Narcotics Anonymous, or other agencies that provide similar services to those seeking support for substance use disorders shall be considered an essential health benefit and the services provided thereby shall be permitted during the disaster emergency; provided, that adequate measures are implemented to provide the services safely within whatever guidelines may be established to address the issues relative to the declared disaster emergency.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 416, § 1, effective July 14, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 417, § 1, effective July 14, 2021.